Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Major Energy Project Developments

§ 57-1-251.
Definitions.

Words and phrases used in Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 shall have meanings as follows, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Bonds” means general obligation bonds, interim notes and other evidences of debt of the State of Mississippi issued pursuant to Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261.

“Department” means the Department of Economic and Community Development.

“Facility related to the project” means and includes any of the following, as the same may pertain to the project: (i) facilities to provide potable and industrial water supply systems and sewage and waste disposal systems to the site of the project; (ii) airports, airfields and air terminals; (iii) rail lines; (iv) port and marine terminal facilities; (v) pipelines; (vi) storage facilities; (vii) highways, streets and other roadways, including curbing, guttering and storm water sewers; (viii) public school buildings, classrooms and instructional facilities, day care centers, including any functionally related facilities; (ix) parks, outdoor recreation facilities and athletic facilities; (x) auditoriums, pavilions, campgrounds, art centers, cultural centers, folklore centers and other public facilities; (xi) health care facilities, public or private; (xii) buildings and appurtenances used in support of the project; (xiii) security systems, fire suppression and prevention systems, utility distribution systems; and (xiv) on-site utilities, including, but not limited to, electricity, natural gas, telephone and other telecommunications facilities.

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, governmental unit, public agency, political subdivision, or any other group acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular.

“Project” means the Strategic Petroleum Reserve, proposed to be constructed by the Department of Energy, any successor agency thereto, or a private entity engaged in the business of purchasing, storing, and offering for sale or resale, petroleum products or natural gas, together with all real property required for construction, maintenance and operation of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve, and all building, tunneling and other supporting land facilities required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve; or any project specifically designed to produce, manufacture, mine, or temporarily store a source of energy, either as primary energy or as a secondary energy for distribution or sale, or both, to persons located at or near the site of production, manufacture, mining, or storage, when such production, manufacturing, mining and temporary storage activities are limited to the indigenous natural resources of the state, including oil, natural gas, lignite and other coal resources, bioenergy resources, salt domes, depleted underground reservoirs and aquifers suited for the temporary storage of hydrocarbons to be used as primary energy sources.

“Public agency” means and includes:

Any department, board, commission, institution or other agency or instrumentality of the state;

Any city, town, county, political subdivision, school district or other district created or existing under the laws of the state or any public agency of any such city, town, county, political subdivision or district;

Any department, commission, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America; and

Any other state of the United States of America which may be cooperating with respect to location of the project within the state, or any agency thereof.

“State” means State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 57-1-253.
Duties of department as to proposal, planning, financing, development, operation, etc., of project; cooperation by other agencies.

The department is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state in submitting a siting proposal for the project. The department is empowered to take all steps appropriate or necessary to effect the siting, development, and operation of the project within the state. If the state is selected as the preferred site for the project, the department is hereby designated and empowered to act on behalf of the state and to represent the state in the planning, financing, development, construction and operation of the project or any facility related to the project, with the concurrence of the affected public agency. The department may take affirmative steps to coordinate fully all aspects of the submission of a siting proposal for the project and, if the state is selected as the preferred site, to coordinate fully, with the concurrence of the affected public agency, the development of the project or any facility related to the project with private business, the United States government and other public agencies. All public agencies are encouraged to cooperate to the fullest extent possible to effectuate the duties of the department; however, the development of the project or any facility related to the project by the department may be done only with the concurrence of the affected public agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 57-1-255.
Bonds and notes; Major Energy Project Development Fund.

Upon notification to the department by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site for the project, the State Bond Commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized and directed, upon receipt of a declaration from the department as hereinafter provided, to borrow money and issue general obligation bonds of the state in one or more series for the purposes herein set out. Upon such notification, the department may thereafter from time to time declare the necessity for the issuance of general obligation bonds as authorized by this section and forward such declaration to the State Bond Commission, provided that prior to said notification, the department may enter into agreements with the United States government, private companies and others that will commit the department to direct the State Bond Commission to issue bonds for eligible undertakings set out in subsection (4) of this section, conditioned on the siting of the project in the state.

Upon receipt of any such declaration from the department, the State Bond Commission, upon verifying that the state has been selected as the site of the project, shall act as the issuing agent for the series of bonds directed to be issued in such declaration pursuant to authority granted in this section.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section shall not exceed an aggregate principal amount in the sum of Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under the authority of this section after June 30, 2000.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued pursuant to this section may be applied for the purposes of: (a) defraying all or any designated portion of the costs incurred with respect to acquisition, planning, design, construction, installation, rehabilitation, improvement and relocation of the project and any facility related to the project, including costs of design and engineering, all costs incurred to provide land, easements and rights-of-way, relocation costs with respect to the project and with respect to any facility related to the project located within the project area, and costs associated with mitigation of environmental impacts; (b) providing for the payment of interest on the bonds; (c) providing debt service reserves; and (d) paying underwriters discount, original issue discount, accountants’ fees, engineers’ fees, attorney’s fees, rating agency fees and other fees and expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds. Such bonds shall be issued from time to time and in such principal amounts as shall be designated by the department not to exceed in aggregate principal amount the amount authorized in subsection (3) of this section. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued pursuant to this section may be invested, subject to federal limitations, pending their use, in such securities as may be specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earning on such investment applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable in the manner hereinafter set forth. The bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the state, shall mature absolutely at such time or times, be redeemable prior to maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission. Provided, however, that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five (25) years from date thereof. The bonds shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be imprinted on or affixed thereto, attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds, who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code and in exercising the powers granted by Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The State Bond Commission shall sell the bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, as shall be fixed by the State Bond Commission. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; provided that the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any bond shall be published at least one (1) time, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a large national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that the bonds, at the option of the state, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

State bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be the general obligations of the state and backed by the full faith and credit of the state, and if the funds appropriated by the Legislature shall be insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized and directed to issue such warrants payable out of any funds authorized by this section for such purpose, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of and interest on all bonds issued under the provisions of this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

The bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261. Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds hereunder, the State Bond Commission is hereby authorized to negotiate and enter into any purchase, loan, credit or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution or to issue and sell interim notes for the purpose of making any payments authorized under this section. All borrowings made under this provision shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding the amount of bonds authorized herein, in such form and in such denomination and subject to such terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest not to exceed the maximum rate authorized herein for bonds, and time of payment of interest as the State Bond Commission shall agree to in such agreement. Such notes shall constitute general obligations of the state and shall be backed by the full faith and credit of the state. Such notes may also be issued for the purpose of refunding previously issued notes; provided that no notes shall mature more than three (3) years following the date of issuance of the first note hereunder and provided further, that all outstanding notes shall be retired from the proceeds of the first issuance of bonds hereunder. The State Bond Commission is authorized to provide for the compensation of any purchaser of the notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission and for all other costs and expenses of issuance and service, including paying agent costs. Such costs and expenses may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.

The bonds and interim notes authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the First Judicial District of the Chancery Court of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the State Bond Attorney, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

Any bonds or interim notes issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261, a transaction relating to the sale or securing of such bonds or interim notes, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes.

All bonds issued pursuant to Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 shall be legal investments for trustees, other fiduciaries, savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the “Major Energy Project Development Fund” wherein shall be deposited the proceeds of the bonds issued under Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 and all monies received by the department to carry out the purposes of such sections. Expenditures authorized herein shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn from the fund, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the director of the department.

There is hereby created the “Major Energy Project Development Sinking Fund” from which the principal of and interest on such bonds shall be paid by appropriation. All monies paid into the sinking fund not appropriated to pay accruing bonds and interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are provided by law for the investment of the sinking funds of the state.

In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be canceled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as canceled and paid bonds and notes and thereafter all payments of interest thereon shall cease and the canceled bonds, notes and coupons, together with any other canceled bonds, notes and coupons, shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two (2) years after cancellation. A certificate evidencing the destruction of the canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the seller.

The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the Department of Finance and Administration and Legislative Budget Office by September 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments. It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every executive budget submitted to the Legislature full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 and the status of the sinking fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 482, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 57-1-257.
Acts of public agencies authorized for purpose of planning, design, undertaking, and carrying out project.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, design, undertaking and carrying out of the project or any facility related to the project, any public agency is authorized and empowered upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine: (a) to enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, with the department respecting action to be taken by such public agency with respect to the acquisition, planning, construction, improvement, operation, maintenance or funding of the project or any such facility, and which agreements may include (i) the appropriation or payment of funds to the department or to a trustee in amounts which shall be sufficient to enable the department to defray any designated portion or percentage of the expenses of administering, planning, designing, constructing, acquiring, improving, operating, and maintaining the project or any facility related to the project, (ii) the appropriation or payment of funds to the department or to a trustee to pay interest and principal (whether at maturity or upon sinking fund redemption) on bonds of the department issued pursuant to Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 and to fund reserves for debt service, for operation and maintenance and for renewals and replacements, and to fulfill requirements of any covenant with respect to debt service contained in any resolution, trust indenture or other security agreement relating to the bonds of the department issued pursuant to Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 and (iii) the furnishing of other assistance in connection with the project or facility related to the project; (b) to dedicate, sell, donate, convey or lease any property or interest in property to the department or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to the department; (c) to incur the expense of any public improvements made or to be made by such public agency in exercising the powers granted in this section; (d) to lend, grant or contribute funds to the department; (e) to cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational areas, community meeting facilities, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished to or with respect to the project or any such facility; (f) to furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, upgrade or improve highways, streets, roads, sidewalks, airports, railroads, or ports; (g) to plan or replan, zone or rezone any parcel of land within the public agency or make exceptions from land use, building and zoning regulations; and (h) to cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the department, including services pertaining to the acquisition of real property and the furnishing of relocation assistance. Any contract between a public agency entered into with the department pursuant to any of the powers granted by Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 shall be binding upon said public agency according to its terms, and such public agency shall have the power to enter into such contracts as in the discretion of the governing authorities thereof would be to the best interest of the people of such public agency. Such contracts may include within the discretion of such governing authorities of public agencies defined under Section 57-1-251(f)(ii) a pledge of the full faith and credit of such public agency for the performance thereof. If at any time title to or possession of the project or any such facility is held by any public body or governmental agency other than the department, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 to the contrary, any contract entered into between the department and any public agency for the appropriation or payment of funds to the department under item (a)(ii) of this section shall contain a provision therein requiring monthly payments by the public agency to pay its indebtedness and, if the public agency is not a county or municipality, such contract shall include as an additional party to the contract the county or municipality (referred to in this paragraph as “levying authority”) that levies and collects taxes for the contracting public agency. If the public agency fails to pay its indebtedness for any month, the department shall certify to the State Tax Commission, or other appropriate agency, the amount of the delinquency, and the State Tax Commission shall deduct such amount from the public agency’s or levying authority’s, as the case may be, next allocation of sales taxes, petroleum taxes, highway privilege taxes, severance taxes, Tennessee Valley Authority payments in lieu of taxes and homestead exemption reimbursements in that order of priority. The State Tax Commission, or other appropriate agency, shall pay the sums so deducted to the department to be applied to the discharge of the contractual obligation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 57-1-259.
Concurrence of affected county, municipality, and/or school district required.

The department shall not undertake to develop any project or facility related to the project within a county, municipality and/or school district without the concurrence of the affected county, municipality and/or school district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 57-1-261.
Construction of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261.

The provisions of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 are cumulative of other statutes now or hereafter enacted relating to the department, and the department may exercise all presently held powers in the furtherance of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261. If any section, paragraph, sentence, clause, phrase or any part of the provisions of Sections 57-1-251 through 57-1-261 is declared to be unconstitutional or void, or for any reason is declared to be invalid or of no effect, the remaining sections, paragraphs, sentences, clauses and phrases shall in no manner be affected thereby but shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 552 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).